Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1501.01
District court judgment; execution
issued to any county in state; procedure; lien on real estate;
procedure.

Any
person having a judgment rendered by a district court may request the clerk
of such court to issue execution on the judgment in the same manner as execution
is issued upon other judgments rendered in the district court and direct the
execution on the judgment to any county in the state. Such person may request
that garnishment, attachment, or any other aid to execution for personal property
or wages be directed to any county without the necessity of filing a transcript
of the judgment in the receiving county, and any hearing or proceeding with
regard to such execution or aid in execution shall be heard in the court in
which the judgment was originally rendered. Such execution shall not serve
as a lien on real estate in a county other than the county where the judgment
was rendered unless a transcript of the judgment is filed with the clerk of
the district court in the county in which the real estate is located.

Laws 2011, LB15, § 1.